Nevada, session 83, AB431.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 598 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. A primary ticket provider shall not enter into a
contractual agreement to limit a purchaser to reselling a ticket to
or through only one reseller or secondary ticket exchange or any
affiliate of a reseller or secondary ticket exchange.
Sec. 3. A primary ticket provider shall not sell a ticket, in
person or remotely, without first disclosing to the purchaser:
1. The total amount that the purchaser will be charged for the
ticket, including, without limitation, any fees which represent a
portion of the total amount to be charged; and
2. Whether any tickets are being held by the rights holder for
sale at a later date.
Sec. 4. A primary ticket provider, reseller or secondary ticket
exchange or any affiliate of a reseller or secondary ticket
exchange shall not hold a ticket purchased in person or remotely
for delivery at a later date that is more than 24 hours after the time
of purchase.
Sec. 5. NRS 598.09223 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.09223 A person engages in a “deceptive trade practice”
when, in the course of his or her business or occupation, he or she
knowingly violates a provision of NRS 598.397 to 598.3984,
inclusive [.] , and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 6. NRS 598.397 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.397 As used in NRS 598.397 to 598.3984, inclusive, and
sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
the words and terms defined in NRS 598.3971 to 598.3977,
inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*AB431*

– 3 –
Sec. 7. NRS 598.3976 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.3976 “Reseller” means any person who resells a ticket.
The term does not include a person who makes an initial purchase
of a ticket from a primary ticket provider on behalf of another
person.
Sec. 8. NRS 598.3982 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.3982 1. A person injured by a violation of any provision
of NRS 598.397 to 598.3984, inclusive, and sections 2, 3 and 4 of
this act may bring a civil action against a reseller, a secondary ticket
exchange or any affiliate of a reseller or secondary ticket exchange
who committed the violation in a district court in any county:
(a) In which the cause therefor accrued;
(b) In which the defendant resides or may be found;
(c) In which the plaintiff resides; or
(d) In which an athletic contest or live entertainment event to
which the ticket pertains occurred or will occur, if the violation
relates to the sale, purchase or advertisement of a ticket.
2. If the person bringing the action is the prevailing party, the
court shall award that person:
(a) Declaratory and injunctive relief.
(b) For the first violation, $1,000 or actual damages, whichever
is greater.
(c) For the second violation, $2,500, treble the amount of actual
damages and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, if any.
(d) For the third and all subsequent violations, $5,000, treble the
amount of actual damages, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, if
any, and punitive damages, which are subject to the provisions of
NRS 42.005.
3. An action may not be brought pursuant to this section
against a natural person employed by a reseller, a secondary ticket
exchange or any affiliate of a reseller or secondary ticket exchange.
Sec. 9. NRS 598.3983 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.3983 Unless a greater penalty is provided in NRS
598.0999 or 598.3984, a person who knowingly violates the
provisions of NRS 598.397 to 598.3984, inclusive, and sections 2, 3
and 4 of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 10. NRS 598.3984 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.3984 1. A person who willfully and knowingly violates
the provisions of NRS 598.397 to 598.3984, inclusive, and sections
2, 3 and 4 of this act relating to the sale of a ticket to an
entertainment facility which is operated by a governmental entity or
a public-private partnership is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Governmental entity” means:
(1) The government of this State;
-
*AB431*

– 4 –
(2) An agency of the government of this State;
(3) A political subdivision of this State; and
(4) An agency of a political subdivision of this State.
(b) “Public-private partnership” means a contract entered into by
a person and a governmental entity for the support of an
entertainment facility.
H
-
*AB431*